Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 238.545 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A licensed charitable organization shall be limited by the following:
(a) In the conduct of bingo, to one (1) session per day, three (3) sessions per
week, for a period not to exceed five (5) consecutive hours in any day and not
to exceed fifteen (15) total hours per week:
1. A licensed charitable organization shall not conduct bingo at more than
one (1) location during the same twenty-four (24) hour period;
2. A licensed charitable organization shall not award prizes for bingo that
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in fair market value per twenty-
four (24) hour period, including the value of door prizes; and
3. A person under the age of eighteen (18) shall not be permitted to
purchase bingo supplies or play bingo unless he or she is playing for
noncash prizes and is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian and
only if the value of any noncash prize awarded does not exceed ten
dollars ($10);
(b) 1. A licensed charitable organization may provide card-minding devices
for use by players of bingo games.
2. If a licensed charitable organization offers card-minding devices for use
by players, the devices shall be capable of being used in conjunction
with bingo cards or paper sheets at all times.
3. Subject to the authority of the corporation, the office shall have broad
authority to define and regulate the use of card-minding devices and the
corporation may promulgate an administrative regulation concerning use
and control of them;
(c) Charity game tickets shall be sold only at the address of the location
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/9/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1525
designated on the license to conduct charitable gaming;
(d) Charity game tickets may be sold, with prior approval of the office:
1. At any authorized special charity fundraising event conducted by a
licensed charitable organization at any off-site location; or
2. By a licensed charitable organization possessing a special limited
charitable gaming license at any off-site location; and
(e) An automated charity game ticket dispenser may be utilized by a licensed
charitable organization, with the prior approval of the office, only at the
address of the location designated on the license to conduct charitable gaming.
The corporation may promulgate administrative regulations regulating the use
and control of approved automated charity game ticket dispensers.
(2) (a) A prize for an individual charity game ticket shall not exceed two thousand
dollars ($2,000)[five hundred ninety-nine dollars ($599)] in value, not
including the value of cumulative or carryover prizes awarded in seal card
games.
(b) Cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall not exceed two
thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400).
(c) Information concerning rules of the particular game and prizes that are to be
awarded in excess of fifty dollars ($50) in each separate package or series of
packages with the same serial number and all rules governing the handling of
cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall be posted prominently
in an area where charity game tickets are sold. A legible poster that lists prizes
to be awarded, and on which prizes actually awarded are posted at the
completion of the sale of each separate package shall satisfy this requirement.
(d) Any unclaimed money or prize shall return to the charitable organization.
(e) A paper charity game ticket shall not be sold in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky that does not conform to the standards for opacity, randomization,
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/9/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1525
minimum information, winner protection, color, and cutting established by the
office.
(f) An electronic pulltab device representation of a charity game ticket shall not
be sold in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that does not conform to the
construction standards set forth in an administrative regulation promulgated
by the corporation. Electronic pulltab devices shall only be used for charitable
gaming.
(g) A person under the age of eighteen (18) shall not be permitted to purchase, or
open in any manner, a charity game ticket.
(3) (a) Tickets for a raffle shall be sold separately, and each ticket shall constitute a
separate and equal chance to win.
(b) All raffle tickets shall be sold for the price stated on the ticket, and a person
shall not be required to purchase more than one (1) ticket or to pay for
anything other than a ticket to enter a raffle.
(c) Raffle tickets and tickets for charity fundraising raffle games approved by the
office which are offered exclusively at charity fundraising events and special
limited charity fundraising events are not required to be sold separately and
may be sold at discounted package rates.
(d) Raffle tickets shall have a unique identifier on each ticket.
(e) Winners shall be drawn at random at a date, time, and place announced in
advance or printed on the ticket.
(f) All prizes for a raffle shall be identified in advance of the drawing and all
prizes identified shall be awarded.
(4) With respect to charity fundraising events, a licensed charitable organization shall
be limited as follows:
(a) A licensed charitable organization shall not conduct a charity fundraising
event or a special limited charity fundraising event unless they have a license
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/9/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1525
for the respective event issued by the office;
(b) A special license shall not be required for any wheel game, such as a cake
wheel, that awards only noncash prizes the value of which does not exceed
one hundred dollars ($100);
(c) The office may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play
bingo games at a charity fundraising event. Cash prizes for bingo games
played during a charity fundraising event may not exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for the entire event. A person under the age of eighteen (18)
shall not be permitted to play bingo at a charity fundraising event unless
accompanied by a parent or legal guardian;
(d) The office may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play
special limited charitable games at a charity fundraising event authorized
under this section. The office shall not grant approval for the playing of
special limited charitable games under the provisions of a charity fundraising
event license unless the proposed event meets the definition of a charity
fundraising event held for community, social, or entertainment purposes apart
from charitable gaming in accordance with KRS 238.505(11);
(e) Except for state, county, city fairs, and special limited charity fundraising
events, a charity fundraising event license issued under this section shall not
exceed seventy-two (72) consecutive hours. A licensed charitable
organization shall not be eligible for more than eight (8) total charity
fundraising event licenses per year, including two (2) special limited charity
fundraising event licenses. A person under eighteen (18) years of age shall not
be allowed to play or conduct any special limited charitable game. Subject to
the authority of the corporation, the office shall have broad authority to
regulate the conduct of special limited charity fundraising events in
accordance with the provisions of KRS 238.547; and
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/9/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1525
(f) Charity fundraising events may be held:
1. On or in the premises of a licensed charitable organization;
2. In a licensed charitable gaming facility, subject to restrictions contained
in KRS 238.555(7); or
3. At an unlicensed facility which shall be subject to the requirements
stipulated in KRS 238.555(3), and subject to the restrictions contained in
KRS 238.547(2).
(5) Presentation of false, fraudulent, or altered identification by a minor shall be an
affirmative defense in any disciplinary action or prosecution that may result from a
violation of age restrictions contained in this section, if the appearance and
character of the minor were such that his or her age could not be reasonably
ascertained by other means.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/9/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed